North Carolina statutes. Chapter 35A. Incompetency and Guardianship.
Article 15. Mortgage or Sale of Estates Held by the Entireties.

§ 35A-1310.
Where one spouse or both incompetent; special proceeding before clerk.

In all cases where a husband and wife shall be seized of property as an estate by the entireties, and the wife or the husband or both shall be or become mentally incompetent to execute a conveyance of the estate so held, and the interest of said parties shall make it necessary or desirable that such property be mortgaged or sold, it shall be lawful for the mentally competent spouse and/or the guardian of the mentally incompetent spouse, and/or the guardians of both (where both are mentally incompetent) to file a petition with the clerk of the superior court in the county where the lands are located, setting forth all facts relative to the status of the owners, and showing the necessity or desirability of the sale or mortgage of said property, and the clerk, after first finding as a fact that either the husband or wife, or both, are mentally incompetent, shall have power to authorize the interested parties and/or their guardians to execute a mortgage, deed of trust, deed, or other conveyance of such property, provided it shall appear to said clerk’s satisfaction that same is necessary or to the best advantage of the parties, and not prejudicial to the interest of the mentally incompetent spouse. All petitions filed under the authority of this section shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county where the real estate or any part of same is situated.

History.

1935, c. 59, s. 1; 1945, c. 426, s. 5; c. 1084, s. 5; 1987, c. 550, s. 2.

§ 35A-1311.
General law applicable; approved by judge.

The proceedings herein provided for shall be conducted under and shall be governed by laws pertaining to special proceedings, and it shall be necessary for any sale or mortgage or other conveyance herein authorized to be approved by a superior court judge who has jurisdiction pursuant to

G.S. 7A-47.1

or

G.S. 7A-48

in the district or set of districts as defined in

G.S. 7A-41.1

wherein the property or any part of same is located.

History.

1935, c. 59, s. 2; 1945, c. 426, s. 6; 1987, c. 550, s. 2; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 84.

Cross References.

As to general law on special proceedings, see

G.S. 1-393

et seq.

§ 35A-1312.
Proceeding valid in passing title.

Any mortgage, deed, or deed of trust executed under authority of this Article by a regularly conducted special proceeding as provided shall have the force and effect of passing title to said property to the same extent as a deed executed jointly by husband and wife, where both are mentally capable of executing a conveyance.

History.

1935, c. 59, s. 3; 1987, c. 550, s. 2.

§ 35A-1313.
Clerk may direct application of funds; purchasers and mortgagees protected.

In all cases conducted under this Article it shall be competent for the court, in its discretion, to direct the application of funds arising from a sale or mortgage of such property in such manner as may appear necessary or expedient for the protection of the interest of the mentally incompetent spouse: Provided, however, this section shall not be construed as requiring a purchaser or any other party advancing money on the property to see to the proper application of such money, but such purchaser or other party shall acquire title unaffected by the provisions of this section.

History.

1935, c. 59, s. 4; 1987, c. 550, s. 2.

§ 35A-1314.
Prior sales and mortgages validated.

Any and all special proceedings under which estates by the entireties have been sold or mortgaged prior to March 5, 1935, under circumstances contemplated in this Article are hereby in all respects ratified and confirmed, provided that such proceeding or proceedings are otherwise regular and conformable to law.

History.

1935, c. 59, s. 5; 1987, c. 550, s. 2.

§§ 35A-1315 through 35A-1319.

Reserved for future codification purposes.